California statutes. Education Code
(1) Use the funds to develop a comprehensive needs assessment of all schoolsites eligible for grants pursuant to subdivision (b). The assessment shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following information for each schoolsite:

(A) The year each building that is currently used for instructional purposes was constructed.

(B) The year, if any, each building that is currently used for instructional purposes was last modernized.

(C) The pupil capacity of the school.

(D) The number of pupils enrolled in the school.

(E) The density of the school campus measured in pupils per acre.

(F) The total number of classrooms at the school.

(G) The age and number of portable classrooms at the school.

(H) Whether the school is operating on a multitrack, year-round calendar, and, if so, what type.

(I) Whether the school has a cafeteria, or an auditorium or other space used for pupil eating and not for class instruction.

(J) The useful life remaining of all major building systems for each structure housing instructional space, including, but not limited to, sewer, water, gas, electrical, roofing, and fire and life safety protection.

(K) The estimated costs for five years necessary to maintain functionality of each instructional space to maintain health, safety, and suitable learning environment, as applicable, including classroom, counseling areas, administrative space, libraries, gymnasiums, multipurpose and dining space, and the accessibility to those spaces.

(L) A list of necessary repairs.

(2) Use the data currently filed with the state as part of the process of applying for and obtaining modernization or construction funds for school facilities, or information that is available in the California Basic Education Data System for the element required in subparagraphs (D), (E), (F), and (G) of paragraph (1).

(3) Use the assessment as the baseline for the facilities inspection system required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17070.75.

(4) Provide the results of the assessment to the Office of Public School Construction, including a report on the expenditures made in performing the assessment. It is the intent of the Legislature that the assessments be completed as soon as possible, but not later than January 1, 2006.

(5) If a school district does not need the full amount of the allocation it receives pursuant to this section, the school district shall expend the remaining funds for making facilities repairs identified in its needs assessment. The school district shall report to the Office of Public School Construction on the repairs completed pursuant to this paragraph and the cost of the repairs.

(6) Submit to the Office of Public School Construction an interim report regarding the progress made by the school district in completing the assessments of all eligible schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 8.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.71.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account. The State Allocation Board shall administer the account.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2005–06 fiscal year, an amount of moneys shall be transferred in the annual Budget Act from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account, equaling 50 percent of the unappropriated balance of the Proposition 98 Reversion Account or one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), whichever amount is greater. Moneys transferred pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for the purpose of addressing emergency facilities needs pursuant to Section 17592.72.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2008–09 fiscal year, the amount of money to be transferred from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed one hundred one million dollars ($101,000,000).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2009–10 fiscal year, the amount of money to be transferred from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be zero dollars ($0).

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2010–11 fiscal year, the amount of money to be transferred from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be zero dollars ($0).

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (1),
 for the 2011–12 fiscal year, the amount of money to be transferred from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be zero dollars ($0).

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 fiscal years, the amount of money to be transferred from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be zero dollars ($0).

(c) The Legislature may transfer to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account other one-time Proposition 98 funds, except funds specified pursuant to Section 41207, as repealed and added by Section 6 of Chapter 216 of the Statutes of 2004. Donations by private entities shall be deposited in the account and, for tax purposes, be treated as otherwise provided by law.

(d) Funds shall be transferred pursuant to this section until a total of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) has been disbursed from the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account.

(e) Any unencumbered balance available in the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account after July 1, 2018, shall revert to the Proposition 98 Reversion Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 18.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.72.

(a) (1) For the 2005–06 fiscal year, all moneys in the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account are available for reimbursement to schools ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the Academic Performance Index, pursuant to Section 52056, based on the 2003 base Academic Performance Index score for each school, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 17592.70, to meet the repair costs of the school district projects that meet the criteria specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) and as approved by the State Allocation Board.

(2) Commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year, all moneys in the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account are available for the purpose of providing emergency repair grants to schools ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the Academic Performance Index, pursuant to Section 52056, based on the 2003 base Academic Performance Index score for each school, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 17592.70, to cover the costs of school district repair projects that meet the criteria specified in subdivisions (c) and (d). The State Allocation Board shall establish a grant application process, grant parameters, substantial progress requirements, and a process for providing certification of the completion of projects. The State Allocation Board shall post the grant application form on its Internet Web site.

(3) For subsequent fiscal years, schools shall be eligible for funding based on the Academic Performance Index scores as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1240.

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that each school district exercise due diligence in the administration of deferred maintenance and regular maintenance in order to avoid the occurrence of emergency repairs.

(2) Funds made available pursuant to this article shall supplement, not supplant, existing funds available for maintenance of school facilities.

(3) The board is authorized to deny future funding pursuant to this article to a school district if the board determines that there is a pattern of failure to exercise due diligence pursuant to paragraph (1) or supplantation. If the board finds a pattern of failure to exercise due diligence, the board shall notify the county superintendent of schools in which the school district is located.

(c) (1) For purposes of this article, “emergency facilities needs” means structures or systems that are in a condition that poses a threat to the health and safety of pupils or staff while at school. These projects may include, but are not limited to, the following types of facility repairs or replacements:

(A) Gas leaks.

(B) Nonfunctioning heating, ventilation, fire sprinklers, or air-conditioning systems.

(C) Electrical power failure.

(D) Major sewer line stoppage.

(E) Major pest or vermin infestation.

(F) Broken windows or exterior doors or gates that will not lock and that pose a security risk.

(G) Abatement of hazardous materials previously undiscovered that pose an immediate threat to pupil or staff.

(H) Structural damage creating a hazardous or uninhabitable condition.

(2) For purposes of this section, “emergency facilities needs” does not include any cosmetic or nonessential repairs.

(d) For the purpose of this section, structures or components shall only be replaced if it is more cost-effective than repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 704, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.73.

The State Allocation Board shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt regulations and review and amend its regulations, as necessary, pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), for the administration of this article, including those regulations necessary to specify the qualifications of the personnel performing the needs assessment and a method to ensure their independence. The initial regulations adopted pursuant to this article shall be adopted as emergency regulations, and the circumstances related to the initial adoption are hereby deemed to constitute an emergency for this purpose. The initial regulations adopted pursuant to this article shall be adopted by January 31, 2005.

(b) Establish and publish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of this article as it deems necessary.

(c) Apportion funds to eligible school districts under this article.

(d) Provide technical assistance to school districts to implement this article.

(e) Submit an interim status report to the Legislature and the Governor by June 30, 2005, by compiling the reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (d) of Section 17592.70.

(f) By June 30, 2008, report to the Legislature and the Governor on expenditures pursuant to Section 17592.72 and projections of future expenditures pursuant to Section 17592.72.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.74.

Notwithstanding any other law, the funds provided to school districts from the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to this article for the purpose of emergency repair grants shall not be deposited into a school district deferred maintenance fund for purposes described in Section 17582.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 65.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties of District Clerks [17593. - 17593.]

17593.

The clerk of each district except a district governed by a city or city and county board of education shall, under the direction of the governing board, keep the schoolhouses in repair during the time school is taught therein, and exercise a general care and supervision over the school premises and property during the vacations of the school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contracts [17595. - 17606.]

17595.

Nothing in this code shall preclude the governing board of any school district from purchasing materials, equipment, or supplies through the Department of General Services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10299 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17596.

Continuing contracts for work to be done, services to be performed, or for apparatus or equipment to be furnished, sold, built, installed, or repaired for the district, or for materials or supplies to be furnished or sold to the district may be made with an accepted vendor as follows: for work or services, or for apparatus or equipment, not to exceed five years; for materials or supplies, not to exceed three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17597.

In addition to utilizing the procedures specified in Article 14 (commencing with Section 17545) of Chapter 4, any school district or any county board of education may, by direct sale or otherwise, sell to a purchaser any electronic data processing equipment, other major items of equipment, or any relocatable building owned by, or to be owned by, the school district or county board, if the purchaser agrees to lease the equipment or building back to the school district or county for use by the school district or county following the sale.

The approval by the governing board of the school district or of the county superintendent of schools of the sale and leaseback shall be given only if the governing board of the school district or the county superintendent of schools finds, by resolution, that the equipment is data processing equipment, another major item of equipment, or a relocatable building within the meaning of this section and that the sale and leaseback is the most economical means for providing the electronic data processing equipment, other major items of equipment, or relocatable building to the school district or county. For purposes of determining the area of existing adequate school construction under the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976, any portable relocatable classroom acquired under this section and used for classroom purposes shall be considered owned by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17598.

The governing board of a school district may contract for electromechanical or electronic data processing work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17599.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of any school district to contract for electromechanical or electronic data processing work to be done or related services to be performed with any other public agency pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code or Section 11000 or 11001 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17600.

The governing board of any district defined hereafter, in addition to any other authority granted by law, may employ as classified employees, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the personnel commission, any certificated employees of the district or districts during vacation periods, or on any other day or days when the certificated employee is not required to perform services for the district, to repair or build apparatus or equipment related to their duties as certificated employees even though the total cost of labor exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000). This section applies only when the average daily attendance of any school district, or of two or more school districts governed by governing boards of identical personnel, is 400,000 or more, as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding school year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.

Notwithstanding any limitations imposed by this article specifically with respect to electromechanical or electronic data processing work to be done or related services to be performed, the governing board of a school district, the boundaries of which are coterminous with those of the City and County of San Francisco, may contract for such work to be done or related services to be performed, without regard to such limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17602.

The governing board of any school district may purchase from the federal government or any agency thereof any surplus property, as defined in the Surplus Property Act of 1944, in any amount needed for the operation of the schools of the district without taking estimates or advertising for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17603.

The governing board of any school district shall determine the method of payment for construction contracts, including progress payments for completed portions of the work or for materials delivered on the ground or stored subject to the control of the board and unused.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17604.

Wherever in this code the power to contract is invested in the governing board of the school district or any member thereof, the power may by a majority vote of the board be delegated to its district superintendent, or to any persons that he or she may designate, or if there be no district superintendent then to any other officer or employee of the district that the board may designate. The delegation of power may be limited as to time, money or subject matter or may be a blanket authorization in advance of its exercise, all as the governing board may direct. However, no contract made pursuant to the delegation and authorization shall be valid or constitute an enforceable obligation against the district unless and until the same shall have been approved or ratified by the governing board, the approval or ratification to be evidenced by a motion of the board duly passed and adopted. In the event of malfeasance in office, the school district official invested by the governing board with the power of contract shall be personally liable to the school district employing him or her for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of the malfeasance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17605.

The governing board by majority vote may adopt a rule, delegating to any officer or employee of the district as the board may designate, the authority to purchase supplies, materials, apparatus, equipment, and services. No rule shall authorize any officer or employee to make any purchases involving an expenditure by the district in excess of the amount specified by Section 20111 of the Public Contract Code. The rule shall prescribe the limits of the delegation as to time, money, and subject matter. All transactions entered into by the officer or employee shall be reviewed by the governing board every 60 days.

In the event of malfeasance in office, the school district officer or employee invested by the governing board with the power to contract shall be personally liable for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of the malfeasance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17606.

The governing board of any school district with an average daily attendance of not less than 60,000 may by majority vote authorize its district superintendent, or such person as he or she may designate, to expend up to one hundred dollars ($100) per transaction for work done, compensation for employees or consultants, and purchases of equipment, supplies, or materials. Ratification by the governing board shall not be required with respect to transactions entered into pursuant to this section. In the event of malfeasance in office, the school district official invested by the governing board with authority to act under this section shall be personally liable for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of the malfeasance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Healthy Schools Act of 2000 [17608. - 17614.]

17608.

This article and Article 17 (commencing with Section 13180) of Chapter 2 of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code shall be known and cited as the Healthy Schools Act of 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17609.

The definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Antimicrobial” means those pesticides defined by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136(mm)).

(b) “Crack and crevice treatment” means the application of small quantities of a pesticide consistent with labeling instructions in a building into openings such as those commonly found at expansion joints, between levels of construction, and between equipment and floors.

(c) “Emergency conditions” means any circumstances in which the school designee or a property owner of a property where a privately operated child day care facility is located, or the property owner’s agent, deems that the immediate use of a pesticide is necessary to protect the health and safety of pupils, staff, or other persons, or the schoolsite.

(d) “Integrated pest management plan” means a written plan based on a template provided or approved by the Department of Pesticide Regulation that outlines a strategy for integrated pest management, as described in Section 13181 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(e) “School designee” or “IPM coordinator” means a
 schoolsite or school district employee identified by a schoolsite or school district to carry out the requirements of this article or to ensure that the requirements of this article are carried out.

(f) “Schoolsite” means any facility used as a child day care facility, as defined in Section 1596.750 of the Health and Safety Code, or for kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school purposes. The term includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, athletic fields, vehicles, or any other area of property visited or used by pupils. “Schoolsite” does not include any postsecondary educational facility attended by secondary pupils or private kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school facilities. For child day care facilities, the State Department of Social Services shall serve as the liaison to these facilities, as
 needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 2.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17610.

(a) It is the policy of the state that effective least toxic pest management practices should be the preferred method of managing pests at schoolsites and that the state, in order to reduce children’s exposure to toxic pesticides, shall take the necessary steps, pursuant to Article 17 (commencing with Section 13180) of Chapter 2 of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to facilitate the adoption of effective least toxic pest management practices at schoolsites. It is the intent of the Legislature that all school personnel involved in the application of a pesticide at a schoolsite be trained in integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s
 health.

(b) (1) (A) A property owner of a property where a child day care facility is located, or the property owner’s agent, who personally applies any pesticides on an area listed in paragraph (2) shall provide notice to the child day care facility as described in paragraph (3) at least 120 hours before the application, unless an emergency condition, as defined in Section 17609, exists.

(B) An owner of property on which a child day care facility is located shall be subject to the requirement to provide notice pursuant to this subdivision 30 days after it has received notice from a child day care facility of its presence at the property, unless the property owner, or his or her agent, received that notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (d) of Section 1597.40 of the Health and Safety Code before the effective date of this subdivision in which case the property owner shall be subject to the notice requirements on and after the effective date of this subdivision.

(2) This subdivision applies when a property owner or his or her agent intends to personally apply pesticides on any of the following:

(A) Inside the rented premises on which the child day care facility is located.

(B) Upon a designated child day care facility playground designated by the property owner.

(C) Upon an area designated for use by the child day care facility.

(D) Upon an area within 10 feet of the perimeter of the child day care facility.

(3) The notice required by paragraph (1) shall include the following:

(A) The product name.

(B) The manufacturer’s name.

(C) The active ingredients of each pesticide.

(D) The United States Environmental Protection Agency’s product registration number.

(E) The intended date of application.

(F) The areas of application listed in paragraph
 (2).

(G) The reason for application.

(4) A notice of pesticide application provided to a tenant pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13186 of the Food and Agricultural Code shall satisfy the notice requirements of this section.

(5) If the child day care facility ceases to operate on the property, the provisions of this act shall no longer apply to the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 3.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17610.1.

(a) (1) The use of a pesticide on a schoolsite is prohibited if that pesticide is granted a conditional registration, an interim registration, or an experimental use permit by the Department of Pesticide Regulation, or if the pesticide is subject to an experimental registration issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and either of the following is applicable:

(A) The pesticide contains a new active ingredient.

(B) The pesticide is for a new use. This paragraph does not apply to a conditionally registered pesticide that is approved for other uses that has fulfilled all registration requirements that relate to human health, including, but not limited to, the completion of mandatory health effect studies pursuant to the Birth Defect Prevention Act of 1984 (Art. 14 (commencing with Sec. 13121), Ch. 2, Div. 7, F. & A.C.). The requirements of this section are not intended to impose any new labeling requirements.

(2) The use of a pesticide on a schoolsite is prohibited if the Department of Pesticide Regulation cancels or suspends registration, or requires phase out of use, of that pesticide.

(b) Vendors or manufacturers of pesticides that are prohibited for use on a schoolsite pursuant to subdivision (a) are prohibited from furnishing those pesticides to school districts or schoolsites either by sale or by gift.

(c) This section does not apply to public health pesticides or antimicrobial pesticides registered pursuant to Section 12836 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17610.5.

Sections 17611 and 17612 shall not apply to a pesticide product deployed in the form of a self-contained bait or trap, to gel or paste deployed as a crack and crevice treatment, to any pesticide exempted from regulation by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.), or to antimicrobial pesticides, including sanitizers and disinfectants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17611.

(a) Each schoolsite shall maintain records of all pesticide use at the schoolsite for a period of four years, and shall make this information available to the public, upon request, pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). A schoolsite may meet the requirements of this section by retaining a copy of the warning sign posted for each application required pursuant to Section 17612, and recording on that copy the amount of the pesticide used.

(b) (1) If a schoolsite chooses to use a pesticide not included within Section 17610.5, at the end of each calendar year, or more often
 at the discretion of a school designee, the school designee shall submit to the Director of Pesticide Regulation a copy of the records of all pesticide use at the schoolsite for the calendar year. The records submitted to the Director of Pesticide Regulation shall be submitted using a form prepared by the Department of Pesticide Regulation similar to that prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13186 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and shall include all of the following:

(A) The name of a school designee for the schoolsite.

(B) The name and address of the schoolsite, or the department code or licensed child daycare facility number indicating if the site is an elementary or secondary school facility, or a child daycare facility.

(C) The product name, manufacturer’s name, the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s product registration number, and the amount used, including the unit of measurement.

(D) The date, time, and location of application.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not include pesticide use reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13186 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 62.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

17611.5.

(a) The school designee may develop and post on the Internet Web site of the schoolsite, or, if the schoolsite does not maintain an Internet Web site, the school district, an integrated pest management plan for the schoolsite or the school district. If neither the schoolsite nor the school district maintains an Internet Web site, the school designee may include the integrated pest management plan with the annual notification sent to staff and parents or guardians of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite pursuant to Section 17612. The integrated pest management plan shall include the name of the school designee or IPM coordinator, include the pesticides expected to be applied at the schoolsite by schoolsite or school
 district employees and hired pest control applicators, and include a date when the plan shall be reviewed and, if necessary, updated.

(b) If a schoolsite chooses to use a pesticide not included within Section 17610.5, the school designee shall post on the Internet Web site of the schoolsite, or, if the schoolsite does not maintain an Internet Web site, the school district, an integrated pest management plan for the schoolsite or the school district. If neither the schoolsite nor the school district maintains an Internet Web site, the school designee shall include the integrated pest management plan with the annual notification sent to staff and parents or guardians of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite pursuant to Section 17612. The integrated pest management plan shall include the name of the school designee or IPM coordinator, include
 the pesticides applied at the schoolsite by schoolsite or school district employees and hired pest control applicators, and include a date when the plan shall be reviewed and, if necessary, updated.

(c) Nothing in this section shall limit or otherwise change the requirements of Section 17612.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 5.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17612.

(a) The school designee shall annually provide to all staff and parents or guardians of pupils enrolled at a schoolsite a written notification of the name of all pesticide products expected to be applied at the schoolsite during the upcoming year. The notification shall identify the active ingredient or ingredients in each pesticide product. The notice shall also contain the Internet address used to access information on pesticides and pesticide use reduction developed by the Department of Pesticide Regulation pursuant to Section 13184 of the Food and Agricultural Code, the Internet address where the schoolsite integrated pest management plan may be found if the schoolsite has posted the plan, and may
 contain other information deemed necessary by the school designee. The notice shall also inform staff and parents and guardians of pupils enrolled at a schoolsite that they may view a copy of the integrated pest management plan in the schoolsite office. No other written notification of pesticide applications shall be required by this act except as follows:

(1) In the written notification provided pursuant to this subdivision, the school designee shall provide the opportunity for recipients to register with the schoolsite if they wish to receive notification of individual pesticide applications at the schoolsite. Persons who register for notification shall be notified of individual pesticide applications at least 72 hours before the application. The notice shall include the product name, the active ingredient or ingredients in the
 product, and the intended date of application.

(2) If a pesticide product not included in the annual notification is subsequently intended for use at the schoolsite, the school designee shall, consistent with this subdivision and at least 72 hours before application, provide written notification of its intended use.

(b) The school designee shall make every effort to meet the requirements of this section in the least costly manner. Annual notification by a school district to parents and guardians shall be provided pursuant to Section 48980.3. Any other notification shall, to the extent feasible and consistent with the act adding this article, be included as part of any other written communication provided to individual parents or guardians. This section shall not require the school
 designee to issue the notice through first-class mail, unless he or she determines that no other method is feasible.

(c) Pest control measures taken during an emergency condition as defined in Section 17609 shall not be subject to the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). However, the school designee or property owner shall make every effort to provide the required notification for an application of a pesticide under emergency conditions.

(d) The school designee shall post each area of the schoolsite where pesticides will be applied with a warning sign. The warning sign shall prominently display the term “Warning/Pesticide Treated Area” and shall include the product name, manufacturer’s name, the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s product registration
 number, intended date and areas of application, and reason for the pesticide application. The warning sign shall be visible to all persons entering the treated area and shall be posted 24 hours before the application and remain posted until 72 hours after the application. In case of a pest control emergency, the warning sign shall be posted immediately upon application and shall remain posted until 72 hours after the application.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (d) shall not apply to schools operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice. The school administrator of a
 school operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice shall notify the chief medical officer of that facility at least 72 hours before the application of pesticides. The chief medical officer shall take any steps necessary to protect the health of pupils in that facility.

(f) This section and Section 17611 shall not apply to activities undertaken at a school by participants in the state program of agricultural vocational education, pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 52450) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, if the activities are necessary to meet the curriculum requirements prescribed in Section 52454. This subdivision does not relieve schools participating in the state program of agricultural vocational education of any duties pursuant to this section for activities that are not directly related to the curriculum
 requirements of Section 52454.

(g) Sections 17610 to 17614, inclusive, shall not apply to family day care homes or property owners of family day care homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, or their agents who personally apply any pesticides.

(h) If pesticide is applied by a property owner or his or her agent, or by a pest control operator, failure to provide notice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17610 or subdivision (d) of Section 13186 of the Food and Agricultural Code shall relieve a privately operated child day care facility from the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 848, Sec. 6.   (SB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17613.

Section 17612 shall not apply to any agency signatory to a cooperative agreement with the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Section 116180 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17614.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2016, and except as provided in subdivision (b), the school designee, and any person, including, but not necessarily limited to, a schoolsite or school district employee, who, in the course of his or her work,
 intends to apply a pesticide at a schoolsite subject to this article, shall annually complete a training course provided by the Department of Pesticide Regulation or an agent authorized by the Department of Pesticide Regulation. The training course shall include integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2016, any person hired to apply a pesticide at a schoolsite subject to this article shall complete at least a one-hour training course in integrated pest management and the safe use of pesticides in relation to the unique nature of schoolsites and children’s health before applying pesticides at a schoolsite subject to this article and during each subsequent